California, session 20252026, SB994.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 2.4.4 (commencing with Section 53235.5) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, to read: Article 2.4.4. Nondisclosure Agreements. Agreements53235.5. (a) (1) (A) A local agency official acting in their official capacity shall not enter into, or request that another individual enter into, a nondisclosure agreement relating to public business that precludes their ability to share information with fellow local agency officials serving on the same council, board, commission, district, or agency.(B) Notwithstanding any other law, a local agency official in violation of subparagraph (A) shall be subject to both of the following:(i) The local agency official shall be disqualified from voting on, participating in deliberations on, or attempting to influence decisions related to the subject matter of the nondisclosure agreement.(ii) The local agency official shall disclose the existence of the nondisclosure agreement, but not its contents to the extent that disclosure of the contents would violate the agreement, and recuse themselves from related matters.(C) Notwithstanding any other law, subparagraph (B) shall also apply to a local agency official acting in their official capacity who entered into, or requested that another individual enter into, a nondisclosure agreement described in subparagraph (A) before January 1, 2027.(2) Any nondisclosure agreement relating to public business that precludes the ability of a local agency official to share information with fellow local agency officials serving on the same council, board, commission, district, or agency and that is entered into or requested by a local agency official acting in their official capacity on or after January 1, 2027, shall be void and unenforceable.(b) (1) An employee of a local agency or a local agency official acting in their official capacity shall not enter into, or request that another individual enter into, a nondisclosure agreement relating to public business that precludes their ability to share information with the local agency official who they serve or the governing body of the local agency that employs them.(2) Any nondisclosure agreement relating to public business that precludes the ability of a local agency official acting in their official capacity to share information with the local agency official who they serve under or the governing body of the local agency that employs them, and that is entered into or requested by staff of a local agency official on or after January 1, 2027, shall be void and unenforceable.(3) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, a local agency official in violation of paragraph (1) shall disclose the existence of the nondisclosure agreement, but not its content to the extent that disclosure of the contents would violate the agreement, and shall recuse themself from related matters.(B) Notwithstanding any other law, subparagraph (A) shall also apply to a local agency official acting in their official capacity who entered into, or requested that another individual enter into, a nondisclosure agreement described in paragraph (1) before January 1, 2027.(c) This article does not apply to a nondisclosure agreement that has been authorized by vote of the local agency’s governing body, with all members concurring, before the agreement’s execution.(c)(d) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(1) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, local agency formation commission, special district, school district, county office of education, or charter school.(2) “Local agency official” means any elected or appointed official of a local agency, any employee of a local agency, or any person serving on a board or commission of a local agency.(d)(e) This article shall not be construed to imply that local agency officials are authorized or advised to enter into nondisclosure agreements precluding information from the public.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.